Idaho, session 2025, S1005.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 45-522, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
45-522. RELEASE OF LIEN ON REAL PROPERTY BY POSTING SURETY BOND --
ACTION AGAINST DEBTOR AND SURETY -- PREFERENTIAL SETTINGS. (1) The lien
claimant is entitled to bring an action against the lien claimant's debtor
and to join therein the surety on the bond. The rights of the lien claimant
under the bond are conditioned on the validity and enforceability of the lien
pursuant to this chapter, and the court may award up to the penal sum of the
bond an amount that may consist of the following components:
(a) (1) The amount found due to the lien claimant by the court;
(b) (2) The cost of preparing and filing the lien claim, including at-
torney's fees, if any;
(c) (3) The costs of the proceedings;
(d) (4) Attorney's fees for representation of the lien claimant in the
proceedings; and
(e) (5) Interest at the rate of seven percent (7%) per annum on the
amount found due to the lien claimant and from the date found by the court
that the sum was due and payable.
(2) Proceedings under subsection (1) of this section are entitled to
priority of hearing second only to criminal hearings. The plaintiff in the
action may serve upon the adverse party a "demand for thirty (30) day set-
ting" in the proper form, and file the demand with the clerk of the court.
Upon filing, the clerk of the court shall, before Friday next, vacate a case
or cases as necessary and set the lien claimant's case for hearing, on a day
or days certain, to be heard within thirty (30) days of the filing of the
"demand for thirty (30) day setting." Only one (1) such preferential set-
ting need be given by the court, unless the hearing date is vacated without
stipulation of counsel for the plaintiff in writing. If the hearing date is
vacated without that stipulation, upon service and filing of a "demand for
thirty (30) day setting," a new preferential setting must be given.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.